Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1806
Snow fences; refusal of access to lands; willful or malicious damage; other violations; penalty.

Any person who shall refuse to allow an agent or employee of the county board access to any lands for the purpose of installing, maintaining or removing any snow fences, or any person who shall violate any other provision of section 39-1805, or any person who shall willfully or maliciously damage or destroy any snow fence installed and erected, as provided for by law, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 6, p. 554;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 216.